Missouri, session 2026, HB3536.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 558.016, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 558.016, to read as follows:
558.016. 1. The court may sentence a person who has been found guilty of an offense
to a term of imprisonment as authorized by section 558.011 or to a term of imprisonment
authorized by a statute governing the offense if it finds the defendant is a prior offender or a
persistent misdemeanor offender. The court [may] shall sentence a person to an extended
term of imprisonment if:
(1) The defendant is a persistent offender or a dangerous offender, and the person is
sentenced under subsection 7 of this section;
(2) The statute under which the person was found guilty contains a sentencing
enhancement provision that is based on a prior finding of guilt or a finding of prior criminal
conduct and the person is sentenced according to the statute; or
(3) A more specific sentencing enhancement provision applies that is based on a prior
finding of guilt or a finding of prior criminal conduct.
2. A "prior offender" is one who has been found guilty of one felony.
3. A "persistent offender" is one who has been found guilty of two or more felonies
committed at different times, or one who has been previously found guilty of a dangerous
felony as defined in subdivision (19) of section 556.061.
4. A "dangerous offender" is one who:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3536 2
(1) Is being sentenced for a felony during the commission of which he knowingly
murdered or endangered or threatened the life of another person or knowingly inflicted or
attempted or threatened to inflict serious physical injury on another person; and
(2) Has been found guilty of a class A or B felony or a dangerous felony.
5. A "persistent misdemeanor offender" is one who has been found guilty of two or
more offenses, committed at different times that are classified as A or B misdemeanors under
the laws of this state.
6. The findings of guilt shall be prior to the date of commission of the present offense.
7. The court shall sentence a person, who has been found to be a persistent offender or
a dangerous offender, and is found guilty of a class B, C, D, or E felony to the authorized term
of imprisonment for the offense that is one class higher than the offense for which the person
is found guilty.
✔